District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
33 act may be cited as the “Cumulative Impacts Analysis Amendment Act of 2025”.
34 Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Environmental Policy Act of 1989, effective October
35 18, 1989 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 8–109.01 et seq.) is amended as follows:
36 (a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.01) is amended to read as follows:
1

37 (1) Strike the phrase “environmental impact” and insert the phrase “environmental
38 impact and cumulative impacts” in its place; and
39 (2) Strike the phrase “environmental effects” and insert the phrase
40 “environmental effects or cumulative impacts” in its place.
41 (b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.02) is repealed.
42 (c) A new section 3a is added to read as follows:
43 “Sec. 3a. Definitions.
44 “For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
45 “(1) “Action” means:
46 “(A) A new project or activity directly undertaken by the Mayor or a
47 board, commission, or authority of the District government; or
48 “(B) A project or activity that involves the issuance, or renewal, of a lease,
49 permit, license, certificate, registration, other entitlement, or permission to act by an agency of
50 the District government.
51 “(2) “Adverse cumulative stressors” means that the combined stressor total of the
52 overburdened community is higher than the overburdened community’s geographic point of
53 comparison or would be made higher than an overburdened community’s geographic point of
54 comparison as a result of the action’s contribution.
55 “(3) “Adverse stressor” means a stressor in the overburdened community that is
56 higher than an overburdened community’s geographic point of comparison or would be made
57 higher than an overburdened community’s geographic point of comparison as a result of the
58 action’s contribution.
59 “(4) “Applicable facility” means any:
2

60 “(A) Major source of air pollution as defined in chapter 2 of title 20 of the
61 District of Columbia Municipal Regulations;
62 “(B) Generator (including a very small quantity generator), transporter, or
63 storage, treatment, transfer or disposal facility as those terms are defined in 40 C.F.R. 260.10;
64 “(C) Sludge processing facility, or incinerator;
65 “(D) Sewage treatment plant with a capacity of more than 50 million
66 gallons per day;
67 “(E) Transfer station, recycling facility, or other solid waste facility;
68 “(F) Scrap metal facility;
69 “(G) Asphalt or concrete plant;
70 “(H) Medical waste facility, or incinerator;
71 “(I) A surface lie-down or parking lot containing more than 20,000 square
72 feet of impervious surface;
73 “(J) A depot, maintenance, or storage facility with capacity to store 10 or
74 more trucks, buses, or other heavy machinery that produce particulate matter through tire wear or
75 the operation of internal combustion engines;
76 “(5) “Climate commitments” means the greenhouse gas emission reduction
77 targets established in section 109d of District Department of the Environment Establishment Act
78 of 2005, effective February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8–151.09d) and
79 policies issued consistent with that law, including the targets established in Clean Energy DC
80 and the District of Columbia Climate and Energy Action Plan.
81 “(6) “Combined stressor total” means the sum of adverse stressors in an
82 overburdened community;
3

83 “(7) “Cumulative impacts action” means any major action located in whole, or in
84 part, in an overburdened community, or any action at an applicable facility located in whole, or
85 in part, in an overburdened community, but does not include an action that DOEE determines:
86 (A) Will substantially reduce the disproportionate impacts on the
87 overburdened community without extending the lifetime of the facility or significantly increasing
88 the capacity and operations of the facility;
89 (B) Is required for a facility to comply with changes to federal and District
90 environmental laws and regulations that reduce stressors; or
91 (C) Provides substantial direct benefits to the overburdened community
92 where it is located in the form of access to affordable housing, food, health care, parks, trails, or
93 public education.
94 “(8) “Cumulative impacts plan” means:
95 “(A) A plan or policy that impacts the siting or operation of applicable
96 facilities in the District, including the Comprehensive Plan and the Districtwide Production
97 Distribution and Repair Report; or
98 “(B) A concept analysis or design of an interstate, freeway, expressway, or
99 arterial road that is inconsistent with the District’s climate commitments. For the purposes of this
100 act, a concept or design of an interstate, freeway, expressway, or arterial road shall be presumed
101 to be consistent with the District’s climate commitments if it:
102 “(i) Incorporates a road diet that reduces by at least 33% the
103 number of available vehicle lanes;
104 “(ii) Introduces restricted lanes that are designated for use by buses
105 or streetcars at least 84 hours a week without expanding the width of the road;
4

106 “(iii) Establishes an off-street recreational trail that is designed for
107 users aged 8-80 years old without expanding the width of the road; or
108 “(iv) Replaces an interstate, freeway, or expressway with a
109 recreational facility, residential or mixed use development, or surface road that is designed to
110 carry 40 percent fewer vehicles per day.
111 “(9) “Disproportionate impact” means the action cannot avoid either:
112 “(A) Creating adverse cumulative stressors in an overburdened community
113 as a result of the action’s contribution; or
114 “(B) Contributing to an adverse stressor in an overburdened community
115 that is already subject to adverse cumulative stressors.
116 “(10) “DOEE” means the Department of Energy and Environment.
117 “(11) “Environment” means the physical conditions that will be affected by a
118 proposed action, including but not limited to, the land, air, water, minerals, flora and fauna.
119 “(12) “Functional equivalent” means the full and adequate description and
120 analysis of the environmental impact of a proposed action by an agency, board, commission, or
121 authority of the District government that examines or imposes environmental controls under
122 procedures that provide for notice, opportunity for public comment, and the creation of a
123 reviewable record.
124 “(13) “Geographic point of comparison” means the comparison area and value
125 used to determine whether an overburdened community is subject to one or more adverse
126 stressors and is determined by selecting the lower value of the District or ward’s 50th percentile,
127 calculated excluding the values of other overburdened communities. For the purposes of this
128 definition, “ward” shall refer to the ward in which the overburdened community is located.
5

129 “(14) “Hazardous substance” means any solid, liquid, gaseous, or semisolid form
130 or combination that, because of its nature, concentration, physical, chemical, or infectious
131 characteristic, as established by the Mayor, may:
132 “(A) Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an
133 increase in a serious, irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or
134 “(B) Pose a substantial hazard to human health or the environment if
135 improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or otherwise managed, including substances
136 that are toxic, carcinogenic, flammable, irritants, strong sensitizers, or that generate pressure
137 through decomposition, heat, or other means and containers and receptacles previously used in
138 the transportation, storage, use, or application of hazardous substances.
139 “(15) “Lead agency” means the District agency designated by the Mayor to have
140 primary responsibility for the preparation of an Environmental Impact Statement (“EIS”), or a
141 Cumulative Impacts Statement (“CIS”).
142 “(16) “Major action” means any action that costs over $1,000,000 and that may
143 have a significant impact on the environment, except that, subject to the exemptions in section 7,
144 the Mayor, pursuant to rules issued in accordance with section 10, shall classify any action that
145 costs less than $1,000,000 as a major action, if the action imminently and substantially affects
146 the public health, safety, or welfare. The cost level of $1,000,000 shall be based on 1989 dollars
147 adjusted annually according to the Consumer Price Index.
148 “(17)(A) “Overburdened community” means any census block group in the top
149 quartile of the 2022 Environmental Justice Index published by the Centers for Disease Control
150 and any census block group in the second quartile of the 2022 Environmental Justice Index that
151 is adjacent to a census block group in the top quartile of the 2022 Environmental Justice Index.
6

152 (B) Five years after the effective date of the Environmental Justice Amendment
153 Act of 2023 (introduced on November 6, 2023) and every 5 years thereafter, DOEE may issue
154 regulations adjusting the definition of an overburdened community, providing that DOEE
155 considers the social vulnerability of residents, including racial or ethnic minority status and
156 socioeconomic status; environmental burdens, including air pollution, potentially hazardous and
157 toxic sites, built environment, transportation infrastructure, water pollution, and urban heat island
158 effect; and health vulnerability, including the incidence of pre-existing chronic diseases, food
159 access, and health care access.
160 (C) DOEE shall publish and maintain a map on its website identifying
161 overburdened communities in the District.
162 “(18) “Stressor” includes:
163 “(A) Sources of environmental pollution, including concentrated areas of
164 air pollution, mobile sources of air pollution, contaminated sites, transfer stations or other solid
165 waste facilities, recycling facilities, scrap yards;
166 “(B) Point-sources of water pollution including water pollution from
167 facilities or combined sewer overflows;, also
168 “(C) Concentrated areas of heat from urban heat island effect;
169 “(D) Conditions that cause significant public health impacts, including
170 accidental injuries or death, asthma, cancer, elevated blood lead levels, cardiovascular disease,
171 dementia, pregnancy loss, maternal mortality and developmental disabilities in the overburdened
172 community; or
173 “(E) Any other stressors as defined by DOEE.”.
174 (d) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.03) is amended as follows:
7

175 (1) Subsection 3(a) is amended to add a new paragraph 2A to read as follows:
176 “(2A) The relationship of the proposed major action to the District’s climate
177 commitments;”.
178 (2) Subsection 3(b) is amended by striking the phrase “registered voters” and
179 inserting the phrase “qualified electors in local elections” in its place.
180 (3) Subsection 3(c) is amended as follows:
181 (A) Strike the phrase “grant or issuance” wherever it appears and insert the
182 phrase “grant, issuance, or renewal” in its place.
183 (B) Strike the phrase “certificate” wherever it appears and insert the
184 phrase “certificate, registration” in its place.
185 (C) Paragraph (3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “this paragraph”
186 and inserting the phrase “paragraph or section 13” in its place.
187 (e) New sections 4a and 4b are added to read as follows:
188 “Sec. 4a. Cumulative Impacts Statement requirements.
189 “(a) Whenever the Mayor or a board, commission, authority, or person proposes or
190 approves a cumulative impacts action, the Mayor, board, commission, authority, or person shall
191 prepare or cause to be prepared, and transmit, in accordance with this section, a detailed CIS at
192 least 60 days prior to implementation of the proposed cumulative impacts action. The CIS shall
193 be written in a concise manner and shall contain:
194 “(1) A detailed description of the neighborhood setting of the facility, which shall
195 include:
196 “(A) The location of any existing applicable facility;
8

197 “(B) The location of community assets, including transit facilities;
198 hospitals; senior, low-income, and public housing; nursing homes; playgrounds; parks; trails; and
199 schools;
200 “(C) Key demographic and economic information from the United States
201 Census, the American Community Survey, or similar sources;
202 “(D) Current zoning and future land use as established in the
203 Comprehensive Plan for the National Capital and any applicable Small Area Plan;
204 “(E) The prevalence of land zoned for production, distribution, and repair
205 in the census block where the facility is (or will be) located as well as adjacent census blocks;
206 and
207 “(F) Existing urban heat island effects and flooding hazards.
208 “(2) A description of the facility's current and proposed operations, including:
209 “(A) A site plan of the facility or equivalent map if no site plan exists;
210 “(B) An explanation of the purpose of the cumulative impacts action
211 sought, including how the action serves the needs of the individuals in the overburdened
212 community;
213 “(C) An assessment of the relationship of the cumulative impacts action to
214 the District’s climate commitments; and
215 “(D) Identification of all stressors that are anticipated as a result of the
216 operation and construction of the facility, as well as processes and investments designed to
217 control or mitigate those stressors;
9

218 “(3) A list of all leases, permits, licenses, certificates, registrations, other
219 entitlements, or permissions to act, by an agency of the District or federal government, required
220 for the facility (including those previously obtained); and
221 “(4) An assessment of the anticipated impacts, both positive and negative, of the
222 construction and operation of the facility on each identified stressor in the overburdened
223 community. The assessment shall assume the facility operates at the maximum usage or output
224 allowable under District and federal law and the terms of the action sought.
225 “(b) If a cumulative impacts action also requires an EIS per section 4, the CIS required by
226 this section may be prepared and transmitted as a supplemental EIS per section 6, provided the
227 supplemental EIS meets the requirements of this section.
228 “(c) The Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall transmit a copy of any CIS
229 prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or any supplemental EIS prepared in lieu of a
230 CIS pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, to the Council, any District agency that has
231 responsibility for implementing the cumulative impacts action or special expertise with respect to
232 any stressors involved, and any affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission. A copy of the
233 CIS, or supplemental EIS prepared in lieu of a CIS, shall be made available for review by the
234 public in the main office of the agency primarily responsible for implementing or permitting the
235 proposed cumulative impacts action. The Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall provide a
236 reasonable period consistent with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
237 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1203; D.C. Official Code § 2–501 et seq.), for comment on
238 any CIS prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or any supplemental EIS prepared in
239 lieu of a CIS pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The Mayor, board, commission, or
240 authority shall conduct a public hearing pursuant to the rules issued in accordance with section
10

241 10(c) for any CIS or supplemental EIS prepared in conjunction with any major action. If 25
242 qualified electors in local elections in an affected single member district request a public hearing
243 on a CIS, or a supplemental EIS prepared in lieu of a CIS, for any other action, or if there is
244 significant public interest, the Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall conduct a public
245 hearing pursuant to the rules issued in accordance with section 10(c).
246 “(d)(1) Upon receipt of an application for a proposed major action, or a proposed action
247 at an applicable facility, the Mayor, board, agency, commission, or authority of the District
248 government shall determine within 30 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays,
249 whether the action is a cumulative impacts action and a CIS is required per subsection (a).
250 “(2) The agency shall notify the applicant, in writing, if a determination has been
251 made that the action is a cumulative impacts action and a CIS is required. Notice of the
252 determination and the findings that support the determination shall be kept on file by the Mayor.
253 “(3) The Mayor, board, commission, or authority may require an applicant to
254 prepare a CIS, or a supplemental EIS in lieu of a CIS. A nongovernmental applicant shall be
255 charged a fee to cover the cost of agency review of the CIS, or supplemental EIS prepared in lieu
256 of a CIS. No lease, permit, license, certificate, registration, or other entitlement shall be issued,
257 unless the applicant required to prepare a CIS has completed the CIS, or a supplemental EIS in
258 lieu of the CIS, in compliance with this act and paid any fee charged pursuant to this paragraph
259 or section 13.
260 “(4) The applicant shall assist the Mayor, or the board, commission, or authority
261 at any stage of the review of the proposed cumulative impacts action by timely submitting all
262 relevant information concerning impact, costs, benefits, and alternatives. The Mayor, board,
11

263 commission, or authority shall deny a proposed action, if the applicant fails to submit relevant
264 information as specified in rules promulgated pursuant to section 10.
265 “(e) No funds appropriated to a District agency shall be expended to implement a
266 cumulative impacts action that has a disproportionate impact identified in a CIS unless the
267 Mayor submits the cumulative impacts action to the Council for its approval and the Council
268 approves the action (in accordance with criteria established by act of the Council).
269 “Sec. 4b. Modified Cumulative Impacts Statement requirements.
270 “(a) Whenever the Mayor or a board, commission, authority, or person proposes or
271 approves a cumulative impacts plan, the Mayor, board, commission, authority, or person shall
272 prepare or cause to be prepared, and transmit, in accordance with this section, a modified CIS at
273 least 60 days prior to implementation of the proposed cumulative impacts plan. The modified
274 CIS shall be written in a concise manner and shall contain:
275 “(1) The neighborhood and demographic context for the plan or policy, including
276 description of the impact it is expected to have on applicable facilities in overburdened
277 communities;
278 “(2) An assessment of the anticipated impacts, both positive and negative, of the
279 adoption of the cumulative impacts plan on each identified stressor in overburdened
280 communities; and
281 “(3) Identification of any disproportionate impact and a description of efforts to
282 mitigate each disproportionate impact, including any reasonable alternatives to the proposed
283 cumulative impacts plan that were considered but rejected.
284 “(b) The Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall transmit a copy of any modified
285 CIS, to the Council, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia, and any affected
12

286 Advisory Neighborhood Commission. A copy of the modified CIS shall be made available for
287 review by the public in the main office of the agency primarily responsible for drafting or
288 implementing the proposed cumulative impacts plan.
289 “(c) No funds appropriated to a District agency shall be expended to implement a
290 cumulative impacts plan that has a disproportionate impact identified in a modified CIS unless
291 the Mayor submits the cumulative impacts plan to the Council for its approval and the Council
292 approves the plan (in accordance with criteria established by act of the Council).”.
293 (f) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.04) is amended as follows:
294 (1) Designate the existing text as subsection (a).
295 (2) New subsections (b) and (c) are added to read as follows:
296 “(b) If the CIS, or the supplemental EIS prepared in lieu of a CIS, identifies a
297 disproportionate impact, the Mayor, board, commission, or authority of the District government
298 shall disapprove the action, unless the applicant proposes mitigating measures or substitutes a
299 reasonable alternative to avoid the disproportionate impact.
300 “(c) If the CIS, or the supplemental EIS prepared in lieu of a CIS, identifies no
301 disproportionate impact, it shall specify the mitigating measures or conditions of operation
302 required to support that finding.”.
303 (g) A new section 5a is added to read as follows:
304 “Sec. 5a. Enforcement and fines.
305 “The Mayor may fine an applicant or revoke an action taken on behalf of an applicant for
306 failure to comply with mitigating measures or conditions of operation identified in an EIS, a CIS
307 or supplemental EIS.”.
308 (h) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.07) is amended to read as follows:
13

309 “Sec. 8. Lead agencies; files.
310 “(a) The Mayor shall designate a lead agency to prepare an EIS, CIS, or supplemental
311 EIS when the preparation of the EIS or CIS requires the input of more than 1 agency. The lead
312 agency shall, if necessary, oversee the preparation of a single, omnibus EIS, ensure reasoned
313 consideration of and distinction among any inconsistent conclusions, and promote coordination
314 with public and private organizations and individuals with a special expertise or recognized
315 interest.
316 “(b) The Mayor shall maintain a file of all EISs, CISs, and supplemental EISs for public
317 review. The file shall be published, regularly updated, maintained, and available for public
318 inspection on a District government website.”.
319 (i) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.08) is amended to read as follows:
320 “Sec. 9. Judicial review.
321 “(a) Where an EIS or a CIS is prepared in connection with the issuance or, approval, or
322 renewal of a lease, permit, license, certificate, registration, or any other entitlement or permission
323 to act by a District government agency that is subject to administrative or judicial review under
324 applicable laws or regulations, the administrative or judicial review shall be governed by the
325 applicable laws and regulations.
326 “(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) The People’s Counsel may bring a civil action on
327 behalf of any individual or individuals suffering a legal wrong, or adversely affected or
328 aggrieved by an order or decision of the Mayor or an agency regarding an action subject to an
329 EIS, CIS, supplemental CIS, or modified CIS, and such civil action shall be subject to review by
330 the District of Columbia Court of Appeals under section 11 of the District of Columbia
14

331 Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1203; D.C. Official Code §
332 2–510).”.
333 (j) Section 10 (D.C. Official Code § 8–109.09) is amended by adding a new subsection
334 (c) to read as follows:
335 “(c) Within 180 days of the effective date of the Environmental Justice Amendment Act
336 of 2023 (introduced on November 6, 2023), the Mayor shall, pursuant to the District of Columbia
337 Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1203; D.C. Official Code §
338 2–501 et seq.), issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this act and to assist District
339 agencies in the review of a cumulative impacts screening form and in the preparation of a CIS.
340 The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding
341 Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve
342 or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review
343 period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.”.
344 (k) Section 13 (D.C. Official Code§ 8–109.12) is amended to read as follows:
345 “Sec. 13. Fees.
346 “Whenever the Mayor reviews an environmental impact or cumulative impacts screening
347 form or prepares, or causes to be prepared, an EIS, a CIS, or supplemental EIS under this
348 subchapter, the Mayor may impose a fee on the applicant to compensate the Mayor for the costs
349 of reviewing the environmental impact or cumulative impacts screening form or preparing the
350 EIS, CIS, or supplemental EIS.”
351 Sec. 3. The District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005, effective
352 February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8–151.01 et seq.), is amended as
353 follows:
15

354 (a) Section 103(b)(1)(C) (D.C. Official Code § 8–151.03(b)(1)(C)) is amended as
355 follows:
356 (1) Strike the phrase “section 3” and insert the phrase “section 3a” in its place;
357 and
358 (2) Strike the phrase “Environmental Impact Statement” and insert the phrase
359 “Environmental Impact Statement or Cumulative Impacts Statement” in its place.
360 (b) Section 106 (D.C. Official Code § 8–151.06) is amended as follows:
361 (1) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
362 semicolon in its place.
363 (2) Paragraph (7)(D)(ii) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase
364 “; and” in its place.
365 (3) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
366 “(8) An Energy and Environmental Justice Division to lead DOEE’s efforts to do
367 the following:
368 (A) Identify and reduce the environmental, energy, climate, and health
369 burdens and cumulative impacts imposed on District residents in overburdened communities;
370 (B) Lead, coordinate, and track incorporation of energy justice and
371 environmental justice into the agency’s processes, priorities, and allocation of resources;
372 (C) Ensure that communities are empowered to exercise their rights to
373 participate in and enforce requirements established under the District’s environmental laws and
374 regulations, particularly those burdened with significant sources of pollution, facing
375 disproportionate cumulative impacts, experiencing chronic energy insecurity, or deprived of
376 distributed and clean energy resources; and
16

377 (D) Ensure that the District’s grid and clean energy investments materially
378 uplift energy insecure households, maximize the equitable deployment of distributed energy
379 resources (including rooftop and community solar, storage, weatherization, and energy efficiency
380 upgrades), minimize land use and wildlife impacts, and protect the public’s access to reliable,
381 resilient, and affordable energy.
382 Sec. 4. Section 2(5) of the Solid Waste Facility Permit Act of 1995, effective February
383 27, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-94; D.C. Official Code § 8–1051 et seq.), is amended by striking the
384 phrase “section 3” and inserting the phrase “section 3a” in its place.
385 Sec. 5. Applicability.
386 (a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
387 budget and financial plan.
388 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
389 an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
390 of the certification.
391 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
392 the District of Columbia Register.
393 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
394 applicability of this act.
395 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
396 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
397 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
398 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
399 Sec. 7. Effective date.
17

400 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
401 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
402 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
403 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
404 Columbia Register.
18